Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.64.030

Deposit of fees—Notice—Public proceeding.

An application for a recount shall state the office or ballot measure for which a recount is requested, and whether the request is for all precincts or only a portion of the precincts in that jurisdiction. The person filing an application for a manual recount shall, at the same time, deposit with the county canvassing board or secretary of state, in cash or by certified check, a sum equal to twenty-five cents for each ballot cast in the jurisdiction or portion of the jurisdiction for which the recount is requested as security for the payment of any costs of conducting the recount. If the application is for a machine recount, the deposit must be equal to fifteen cents for each ballot. These charges shall be determined by the county canvassing board or boards under RCW 29A.64.081.

The county canvassing board shall determine the date, time, and place or places at which the recount will be conducted. Not less than one day before the date of the recount, the county auditor shall notify the applicant or affected parties and, if the recount involves an office, to any person for whom votes were cast for that office of the date, time, and place of the recount. Each person entitled to receive notice of the recount may attend, witness the recount, and be accompanied by counsel.

Proceedings of the canvassing board are public under chapter 42.30 RCW. Subject to reasonable and equitable guidelines adopted by the canvassing board, all interested persons may attend and witness a recount.

[ 2013 c 11 s 67; 2011 c 349 s 24; 2005 c 243 s 20; 2003 c 111 s 1603. Prior: 2001 c 225 s 5; 1991 c 81 s 36; 1987 c 54 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 99; 1965 c 9 s 29.64.020; prior: 1961 c 50 s 2; 1955 c 215 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.64.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.